Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2374.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6161YH (2) 91 th/ns H.F. 2374 Section 1. Section 321.34, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 11E. Iowaâs delta waterfowl plates. 3 a. Upon application and payment of the proper fees, the 4 director may issue Iowaâs delta waterfowl plates to the owner 5 of a motor vehicle subject to registration under section 6 321.109, subsection 1, autocycle, motor truck, motor home, 7 multipurpose vehicle, motorcycle, trailer, or travel trailer. 8 b. Iowaâs delta waterfowl plates shall be designed by the 9 department in cooperation with the Iowa chapters of the delta 10 waterfowl organization. 11 c. The special Iowaâs delta waterfowl fee for letter-number 12 designated Iowaâs delta waterfowl plates is twenty-five 13 dollars. An applicant may obtain personalized Iowaâs delta 14 waterfowl plates upon payment of the fee for personalized 15 plates as provided in subsection 5, which is in addition to the 16 special Iowaâs delta waterfowl fee. 17 d. The fees collected by the director under this subsection 18 shall be paid monthly to the treasurer of state and deposited 19 in the road use tax fund. The treasurer of state shall 20 transfer monthly from the statutory allocations fund created 21 under section 321.145, subsection 2, to the general fund of 22 the state the amount of the special fees collected in the 23 previous month for Iowaâs delta waterfowl plates. Such moneys 24 are appropriated to the department of natural resources to 25 distribute in the form of grants to support delta waterfowl 26 habitat conservation and hunting in Iowa. In the awarding 27 of grants, the department of natural resources shall give 28 first consideration to any state chapter of a nonprofit 29 organization supporting delta waterfowl habitat conservation 30 and improvement, and efforts to increase the number of 31 hunters in this state, and similar nonprofit organizations. 32 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated under this 33 subsection shall not revert. 34 e. Upon receipt of the special registration plates, the 35 -1- LSB 6161YH (2) 91 th/ns 1/ 3 H.F. 2374 applicant shall surrender the current registration plates to 1 the county treasurer. The county treasurer shall validate 2 the special registration plates in the same manner as regular 3 registration plates are validated under this section. The 4 annual special Iowaâs delta waterfowl fee for letter-number 5 designated plates is ten dollars which shall be paid in 6 addition to the regular annual registration fee. The annual 7 fee for personalized Iowaâs delta waterfowl plates is ten 8 dollars which shall be paid in addition to the annual special 9 Iowaâs delta waterfowl fee and the regular annual registration 10 fee. The annual special Iowaâs delta waterfowl fee shall be 11 credited as provided under paragraph âdâ . 12 f. The department shall not condition the issuance of Iowaâs 13 delta waterfowl plates on the receipt of any number of orders 14 for Iowaâs delta waterfowl plates. 15